Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.100

Reports of public depositaries—Certification by director of financial institutions.

(1) On or before each commission report due date, each public depositary shall render to the commission a written report, certified under oath, indicating the total amount of public funds on deposit held by it, the uninsured amount of those funds, the net worth of the depositary, and the amount and nature of eligible collateral then segregated for the benefit of the commission.

(2) The commission may instruct the director of the department of financial institutions to examine and thereafter certify as to the accuracy of any statement to the commission by any state public depositary, or to provide such other examination report information or data as may be required by the commission. The type, content, and frequency of the reports may be determined by the director of the department of financial institutions, consistent with the requirements of the commission as defined by rule.

[ 2009 c 9 s 7; 1996 c 256 s 11; 1984 c 177 s 16; 1983 c 66 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.